Hawaii, session 2026, HB2460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the royal mausoleum, also known as Mauna ʻAla in ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi, is the sacred resting place of the aliʻi of the Kamehameha and Kalākaua dynasties, among other high chiefs of Hawaiʻi.  This wahi pana holds deep cultural, historical, and spiritual significance for Native Hawaiians and the people of Hawaiʻi.  Mauna ʻAla embodies the mana of the aliʻi and the cultural practice of mālama iwi kūpuna, expressing the enduring respect for the ancestors who shaped Hawaiʻi's history and identity. Since its transfer to the department of land and natural resources in 1967, Mauna ʻAla has been maintained by the State.  However, the legislature finds that concerns have arisen from Native Hawaiian organizations, the Aliʻi trusts, and cultural descendants about ensuring that all management decisions uphold traditional protocols, respect genealogical ties, and preserve the sanctity of the site. The legislature believes that a permanent body dedicated exclusively to the protection and management of Mauna ʻAla will provide the necessary cultural guidance, policy continuity, and community oversight to safeguard the site for future generations. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the royal mausoleum commission under the department of land and natural resources to ensure the respectful stewardship, preservation, and appropriate management of the royal mausoleum, or Mauna ʻAla, in accordance with Hawaiian cultural traditions and values. SECTION 2. Chapter 6E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§6E-    Royal mausoleum commission.  (a) There is established a permanent commission to be known as the royal mausoleum commission, placed within the department for administrative purposes.  The commission shall exercise policy‑making authority independent of the department, except for budgetary, fiscal, and personnel administration purposes, regarding the royal mausoleum, also known as Mauna ʻAla.  For the purposes of this section, "commission" means the royal mausoleum commission established under this section. (b) The commission shall consist of the following voting members: (1)  One member chosen from the organizations listed in paragraphs (4) through (9) and appointed by the governor to serve as chairperson of the commission; (2)  One member appointed by the president of the senate with direction from the senate standing committee with primary jurisdiction over Hawaiian affairs; (3)  One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives with direction from the house of representatives standing committee with primary jurisdiction over Hawaiian affairs; (4)  Five representatives of the aliʻi trusts that have founders interred at Mauna ʻAla; one each from Kamehameha Schools, the Liliʻuokalani Trust, the Queen's Health Systems, the Kapiʻolani Medical Center, and the Lunalilo Trust; (5)  Four representatives of the royal societies; one each from the Royal Order of Kamehameha I, ʻAhahui Kaʻahumanu, Hale O Na Aliʻi O Hawaiʻi ʻAhahui Poʻo, and the Daughters and Sons of Hawaiian Warriors Māmakakaua; (6)  One representative from the Association of Hawaiian Civic Clubs; (7)  One representative from an island burial council; (8)  Two lineal descendants of those interred at Mauna ʻAla that are representative of the Kamehameha dynasty and the Kalakaua dynasty, or kahu family members whose genealogy is connected to those interred at Mauna ʻAla; and (9)  One representative from the Daughters of Hawaiʻi; Members of the commission shall serve four-year terms and may be reappointed thereafter to the commission.  Initial appointments shall be staggered, with half of the members serving two-year terms to ensure continuity.  Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties, subject to legislative appropriation. (c) The commission shall: (1)  Develop and implement a comprehensive management plan for the protection, maintenance, and interpretation of Mauna ʻAla, including all crypts, vaults, chapel, structures, and the surrounding grounds; (2)  In consultation with Native Hawaiian organizations, the aliʻi trusts, lineal descendants, and kahu families, establish protocols governing: (A)  Access by visitors, researchers, and practitioners; (B)  Ceremonial and ritual practices; (C)  Curation and interment of remains; and (D)  Selection of the official kahu or curator of Mauna ʻAla to ensure continuity of traditional practice; (3)  Advise and collaborate with the department and other agencies regarding conservation, security, infrastructure, and visitor management; (4)  Accept, receive, and expend gifts, grants, and appropriations for purposes consistent with this section; (5)  Engage the public, Native Hawaiian organizations, and the aliʻi trusts in education, outreach, and consultation regarding Mauna ʻAla; and (6)  Submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, a summary of the condition of the site and the activities of the commission, and financial statements, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (d) The commission may employ an executive director and other staff exempt from chapter 76, subject to legislative appropriation.  Any executive director employed under this section shall report directly to the commission and coordinate with the department to implement policies adopted by the commission. (e) The legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds to support the operations of the commission, including maintenance and cultural programming.  The commission may also receive private or federal funds to further its objectives. (f) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including rules relating to access, ceremonies, maintenance, and the respectful treatment of human remains and artifacts. (g) If any provision of this section, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________